New Jersey, session 222, A3235.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, pediatric long-term care facilities licensed by the Department of Health pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) shall be authorized to admit and provide services to residents age 26 or younger. 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary for the implementation of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.